Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1240.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4.2(b)(3)(ii) and (iii) of the act of May 26, 1947 (P.L.318, No.140), known as the CPA Law, amended June 30, 2025 (P.L.85, No.27), are amended to read:Section 4.2. Requirements for Issuance of Certificate.--* * *(b) Except as provided under subsection (b.1), before an individual may take the examination, the board shall be 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 satisfied that the individual meets all of the following:* * *(3) Has graduated with:* * *(ii) a baccalaureate degree from a college or university accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, or a college or university approved by the board, and completed at least a total of twenty-four semester credits, which credits shall be in accounting and auditing, business law, economics, technology, finance or tax subjects of a content satisfactory to the board, [not necessarily as a part of his undergraduate work] and an additional twelve semester credits in accounting and auditing subjects or tax subjects of a content satisfactory to the board, not necessarily as part of the individual's undergraduate or graduate work; or(iii) a Master's Degree or other post-graduate degree from a college or university accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, or a college or university approved by the board, and completed at least a total of twenty-four semester credits, which credits shall be in accounting and auditing, business law, economics, technology, finance or tax subjects of a content satisfactory to the board, [not necessarily as part of his undergraduate or graduate work.] and an additional twelve semester credits in accounting and auditing subjects or tax subjects of a content satisfactory to the board, not necessarily as part of the individual's undergraduate or graduate work.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1240PN1556 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930